Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2584YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 746 Section 1. Section 80B.3, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. âAcademyâ means the Iowa law enforcement academy , also 3 known as the Gil Hansen law enforcement academy . 4 Sec. 2. Section 80B.4, Code 2025, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 80B.4 Academy created. 7 1. There is hereby created the Iowa law enforcement academy 8 as a central law enforcement training facility, in order to 9 serve the best interests of the state in carrying out the 10 intent and purpose of this chapter . The academy shall be 11 situated at Camp Dodge and the council shall enter into an 12 agreement with the adjutant general which agreement shall 13 provide for the use of certain of the facilities at Camp Dodge, 14 for the remodeling and conversion of existing structures to 15 classrooms and dormitory space, and for the use of land for the 16 site of an administration building. The agreement shall be on 17 such terms and conditions as are necessary to carry out the 18 purpose of this chapter . 19 2. The director of the academy may change the name of the 20 institution to the Gil Hansen law enforcement academy for use 21 in communication with the public, in signage, and in other 22 forms of communication. 23